Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 261E.8, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. a. A student may make application to a community college and the school district to allow the student to enroll for college credit in a nonsectarian course offered by the community college. A comparable course, as defined in rules Senate File 2320, p. 2 adopted by the board of directors of the school district, must not be offered by the school district or accredited nonpublic school which the student attends. b. (1) If the community college offers the course using both instruction that is delivered in person and using instruction that is delivered primarily over the internet, then the student must enroll in the version of the course that uses instruction that is delivered in person unless the superintendent of the school district, or the superintendentâs designee, authorizes the student to enroll in the version of the course that uses instruction that is delivered primarily over the internet. (2) (a) When determining whether to authorize the student to enroll in the version of the course that uses instruction that is delivered primarily over the internet pursuant to subparagraph (1), the superintendent, or the superintendentâs designee, shall consider if the student is prepared for, and likely to be successful in, a course that uses instruction that is delivered primarily over the internet. (b) When determining whether to authorize the student to enroll in the version of the course that uses instruction that is delivered primarily over the internet pursuant to subparagraph (1), the superintendent, or the superintendentâs designee, may consider any other factors deemed relevant by the superintendent, or the superintendentâs designee, including but not limited to potential scheduling conflicts that may impact the studentâs ability to participate in the version of the course that uses instruction that is delivered in person. c. The school board shall annually approve courses to be made available for high school credit using locally developed criteria that establishes which courses will provide the student with academic rigor and will prepare the student adequately for transition to a postsecondary institution. d. If a community college accepts a student for enrollment under this section , the school district, in collaboration with the community college, shall send written notice to the student, the studentâs parent or legal guardian in the case of a minor child, and the studentâs school district. The notice shall list the course, the clock hours the student will be Senate File 2320, p. 3 attending the course, and the number of hours of college credit that the student will receive from the community college upon successful completion of the course. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2320, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor